Illinois, session 104th, HB5000.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act is 5amended by changing Section 8.5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3960/8.5)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)8    Sec. 8.5. Certificate of exemption for change of ownership 9of a health care facility; discontinuation of a category of 10service; public notice and public hearing.11    (a) Upon a finding that an application for a change of 12ownership is complete, the State Board shall publish a legal 13notice on 3 consecutive days in a newspaper of general 14circulation in the area or community to be affected and afford 15the public an opportunity to request a hearing. If the 16application is for a facility located in a Metropolitan 17Statistical Area, an additional legal notice shall be 18published in a newspaper of limited circulation, if one 19exists, in the area in which the facility is located. If the 20newspaper of limited circulation is published on a daily 21basis, the additional legal notice shall be published on 3 22consecutive days. The applicant shall pay the cost incurred by 23the Board in publishing the change of ownership notice in   HB5000 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1newspapers as required under this subsection. The legal notice 2shall also be posted on the Health Facilities and Services 3Review Board's web site and sent to the State Representative 4and State Senator of the district in which the health care 5facility is located and to the Office of the Attorney General. 6An application for change of ownership of a hospital shall not 7be deemed complete without a signed certification that for a 8period of 2 years after the change of ownership transaction is 9effective, the hospital will not adopt a charity care policy 10that is more restrictive than the policy in effect during the 11year prior to the transaction. An application for a change of 12ownership need not contain signed transaction documents so 13long as it includes the following key terms of the 14transaction: names and background of the parties; structure of 15the transaction; the person who will be the licensed or 16certified entity after the transaction; the ownership or 17membership interests in such licensed or certified entity both 18prior to and after the transaction; fair market value of 19assets to be transferred; and the purchase price or other form 20of consideration to be provided for those assets. The issuance 21of the certificate of exemption shall be contingent upon the 22applicant submitting a statement to the Board within 90 days 23after the closing date of the transaction, or such longer 24period as provided by the Board, certifying that the change of 25ownership has been completed in accordance with the key terms 26contained in the application. If such key terms of the   HB5000 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1transaction change, a new application shall be required. 2    Where a change of ownership is among related persons, and 3there are no other changes being proposed at the health care 4facility that would otherwise require a permit or exemption 5under this Act, the applicant shall submit an application 6consisting of a standard notice in a form set forth by the 7Board briefly explaining the reasons for the proposed change 8of ownership. Once such an application is submitted to the 9Board and reviewed by the Board staff, the Board Chair shall 10take action on an application for an exemption for a change of 11ownership among related persons within 45 days after the 12application has been deemed complete, provided the application 13meets the applicable standards under this Section. If the 14Board Chair has a conflict of interest or for other good cause, 15the Chair may request review by the Board. Notwithstanding any 16other provision of this Act, for purposes of this Section, a 17change of ownership among related persons means a transaction 18where the parties to the transaction are under common control 19or ownership before and after the transaction is completed.20    Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing the 21Board to impose any conditions, obligations, or limitations, 22other than those required by this Section, with respect to the 23issuance of an exemption for a change of ownership, including, 24but not limited to, the time period before which a subsequent 25change of ownership of the health care facility could be 26sought, or the commitment to continue to offer for a specified   HB5000 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1time period any services currently offered by the health care 2facility.3    The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 103rd 4General Assembly are inoperative on and after January 1, 2027. 5    (a-3) (Blank). 6    (a-5) Upon a finding that an application to discontinue a 7category of service is complete and provides the requested 8information, as specified by the State Board, an exemption 9shall be issued. No later than 30 days after the issuance of 10the exemption, the health care facility must give written 11notice of the discontinuation of the category of service to 12the State Senator and State Representative serving the 13legislative district in which the health care facility is 14located. No later than 90 days after a discontinuation of a 15category of service, the applicant must submit a statement to 16the State Board certifying that the discontinuation is 17complete. 18    (b) If a public hearing is requested, it shall be held at 19least 15 days but no more than 30 days after the date of 20publication of the legal notice in the community in which the 21facility is located. The hearing shall be held in the affected 22area or community in a place of reasonable size and 23accessibility and a full and complete written transcript of 24the proceedings shall be made. All interested persons 25attending the hearing shall be given a reasonable opportunity 26to present their positions in writing or orally. The applicant   HB5000 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1shall provide a summary or describe the proposed change of 2ownership at the public hearing.3    (c) For the purposes of this Section "newspaper of limited 4circulation" means a newspaper intended to serve a particular 5or defined population of a specific geographic area within a 6Metropolitan Statistical Area such as a municipality, town, 7village, township, or community area, but does not include 8publications of professional and trade associations. 9    (d) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 10Act of the 101st General Assembly shall apply to all 11applications submitted after the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. 13(Source: P.A. 103-526, eff. 1-1-24.) 14    Section 7. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 15Section 5.1007 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 105/5.1007)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)18    Sec. 5.1007. The Antitrust Enforcement Fund. This Section 19is repealed on January 1, 2027.20(Source: P.A. 103-526, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 21    Section 10. The Illinois Antitrust Act is amended by 22changing Sections 7.2a and 13 as follows:   HB5000 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1    (740 ILCS 10/7.2a)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)3    Sec. 7.2a. Notification to the Attorney General.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Acquisition" means an agreement, arrangement, or activity 6the consummation of which results in a person acquiring 7directly or indirectly the control of another person. 8"Acquisition" includes the acquisition of voting securities 9and noncorporate interests, such as assets, capital stock, 10membership interests, or equity interests.11    "Contracting affiliation" means the formation of a 12relationship between 2 or more entities that permits the 13entities to negotiate jointly with health carriers or 14third-party administrators over rates for professional medical 15services, or for one entity to negotiate on behalf of the other 16entity with health carriers or third-party administrators over 17rates for professional medical services. "Contracting 18affiliation" does not include arrangements among entities 19under common ownership.20    "Covered transaction" means any merger, acquisition, or 21contracting affiliation involving between 2 or more health 22care facilities, or provider organizations not previously 23under common ownership or contracting affiliation. A 24transaction is a "covered transaction" subject to the notice 25requirements even if the parties to the transaction are not 26themselves a health care facility or provider organization but   HB5000 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1own or control, directly or indirectly, one or more of the 2 or 2more health care facilities or provider organizations that 3will be under common ownership or contracting affiliation if 4the transaction is consummated, including if parties to the 5covered transaction are private equity companies. 6    "Health care facility" means the following facilities, 7organizations, and related persons:8        (1) An ambulatory surgical treatment center required 9    to be licensed under the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment 10    Center Act.11        (2) An institution, place, building, or agency 12    required to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act.13        (3) A hospital, ambulatory surgical treatment center, 14    or kidney disease treatment center maintained by the State 15    or any department or agency thereof.16        (4) A kidney disease treatment center, including a 17    free-standing hemodialysis unit required to meet the 18    requirements of 42 CFR 494 in order to be certified for 19    participation in Medicare and Medicaid under Titles XVIII 20    and XIX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935.21        (5) An institution, place, building, or room used for 22    the performance of outpatient surgical procedures that is 23    leased, owned, or operated by or on behalf of an 24    out-of-state facility.25        (6) An institution, place, building, or room used for 26    provision of a health care category of service, as defined   HB5000 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1    under the Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act, 2    including, but not limited to, cardiac catheterization and 3    open heart surgery.4    With the exception of those health care facilities 5specifically included in this Section, nothing in this Section 6shall be intended to include facilities operated as a part of 7the practice of a physician or other licensed health care 8professional, whether practicing in his or her individual 9capacity or within the legal structure of any partnership, 10medical or professional corporation, or unincorporated medical 11or professional group. Further, this Section shall not apply 12to physicians or other licensed health care professional's 13practices where such practices are carried out in a portion of 14a health care facility under contract with such health care 15facility by a physician or by other licensed health care 16professionals, whether practicing in his or her individual 17capacity or within the legal structure of any partnership, 18medical or professional corporation, or unincorporated medical 19or professional groups, unless the entity constructs, 20modifies, or establishes a health care facility as 21specifically defined in this Section.22    "Health care provider" means an individual or entity duly 23licensed or legally authorized to provide health care 24services.25    "Health care services" means health care services or 26products rendered or sold by a health care provider within the   HB5000 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1scope of the health care provider's license or legal 2authorization. The term includes, but is not limited to, 3hospital, medical, surgical, dental, vision, and 4pharmaceutical services or products. 5    "Health care services revenue" means the total revenue 6received for health care services in the previous 12 months.7    "Health carriers" has the meaning given to that term in 8Section 10 of the Health Carrier External Review Act.9    "Illinois health care entity" means a health care facility 10or provider organization that has an office in or is doing 11business in this State.12    "Merger" means the consolidation of 2 or more 13organizations, including 2 or more organizations joining 14through a common parent organization or 2 or more 15organizations forming a new organization, but does not include 16a corporate reorganization.17    "Out-of-state health care entity" means a health care 18facility or provider organization that is not headquartered in 19this State and does not do business in this State.20    "Private equity company" means any company or partnership 21that collects capital investments from individuals or entities 22and purchases, as a parent company, at any level of corporate 23ownership, or through another entity or entities so that the 24company completely or partially owns or controls a direct or 25indirect ownership share of an Illinois health care entity or 26an out-of-state health care entity that generates $10,000,000   HB5000 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1or more in annual revenue from patients residing in this 2State. 3    "Provider organization" means a corporation, partnership, 4business trust, association, or organized group of persons, 5whether incorporated or not, which is in the business of 6health care delivery or management and that represents 20 or 7more health care providers in contracting with health carriers 8or third-party administrators for the payment of health care 9services. "Provider organization" includes physician 10organizations, physician-hospital organizations, independent 11practice associations, provider networks, and accountable care 12organizations.13    "Third-party administrator" means an entity that 14administers payments for health care services on behalf of a 15client in exchange for an administrative fee.16    (b) Notice of Health care facilities or provider 17organizations that are party to a covered transaction shall be 18provided provide notice of such transaction to the Attorney 19General no later than 30 days prior to the transaction closing 20or effective date of the transaction.21    Notice of a covered transaction Covered transactions 22between an Illinois health care entity and an out-of-state 23health care entity shall be provided must provide notice under 24this subsection where the out-of-state entity generates 25$10,000,000 or more in annual revenue from patients residing 26in this State.  HB5000 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1    (c) The written notice provided by the parties under 2subsection (b) shall be provided as follows:3        (1) For any health care facility or provider 4    organization that is a party to a covered transaction that 5    is the subject of and files a premerger notification 6    filing with the Federal Trade Commission or the United 7    States Department of Justice, in compliance with the 8    Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, 15 9    U.S.C. 18a, the notice requirement is satisfied by 10    providing a copy of such filing with all attachments to 11    the Attorney General at the same time as it is provided to 12    the federal government.13        (2) For any health care facility involved in that is a 14    party to a covered transaction that is not described in 15    paragraph (1), the notice requirement is satisfied when 16    the healthcare facility files an application for a change 17    of ownership with the Health Facilities and Services 18    Review Board, in compliance with the Illinois Health 19    Facilities Planning Act. The Health Facilities and 20    Services Review Board shall provide a copy of such filing 21    to the Attorney General at the same time as it is provided 22    to the applicable State legislators under subsection (a) 23    of Section 8.5 of the Illinois Health Facilities Planning 24    Act.25        (3) For any health care facility, or provider 26    organization, or any entity that owns or controls,   HB5000 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1    directly or indirectly, a health care facility or provider 2    organization that is involved in organization that is a 3    party to a covered transaction that is not described in 4    paragraph (1) or (2), written notice provided by the 5    parties must include:6            (A) the names of all health care facilities, 7        provider organizations involved in the covered 8        transaction and parties and their current business 9        addresses address;10            (B) identification of all locations where health 11        care services are currently provided by each entity 12        disclosed in subparagraph (A) party;13            (C) a brief description of the nature and purpose 14        of the proposed transaction; and15            (D) the anticipated effective date of the proposed 16        transaction.17    Nothing in this subsection prohibits any entity the 18parties to a covered transaction from voluntarily providing 19additional information to the Attorney General.20    (d) The Attorney General may make any requests for 21additional information from the filing parties that is 22relevant to its investigation of the covered transaction 23within 30 days of the date notice is received under 24subsections (b) and (c). If the Attorney General requests 25additional information, the covered transaction may not 26proceed until 30 days after the filing parties have   HB5000 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1substantially complied with the request. Any subsequent 2request for additional information by the Attorney General 3shall not further delay the covered transaction from 4proceeding. Nothing in this Section precludes the Attorney 5General from conducting an investigation or enforcing State or 6federal antitrust laws at a later date.7    (e) Any party to a covered transaction that health care 8facility or provider organization that fails to comply with 9any provision of this Section is subject to a civil penalty of 10not more than $500 per day for each day during which the party 11health care facility or provider organization is in violation 12of this Section.13    Whenever the Attorney General has reason to believe that a 14party to a covered transaction health care facility or 15provider organization has engaged in or is engaging in a 16covered transaction without complying with the provisions of 17this Section, the Attorney General may apply for and obtain, 18in an action in the Circuit Court of Sangamon or Cook County, a 19temporary restraining order or injunction, or both, 20prohibiting the party health care facility or provider 21organization from continuing its noncompliance or doing any 22act in furtherance thereof. The court may make such further 23orders or judgments, at law or in equity, as may be necessary 24to remedy such noncompliance.25    Before bringing such an action or seeking to recover a 26civil penalty, the Attorney General shall permit the party to   HB5000 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 18143 JRC 31582 b1the covered transaction health care facility or provider 2organization to come into compliance with this Section within 310 days of being notified of its alleged noncompliance. The 4right to cure noncompliance does not exist on or after the 5covered transaction's proposed or actual closing date of the 6covered transaction, whichever is sooner.7    (f) (Blank). This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027.8(Source: P.A. 103-526, eff. 1-1-24.) 9    (740 ILCS 10/13)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)11    Sec. 13. Antitrust Enforcement Fund. Any penalties 12collected from an entity for violations of this Act shall be 13deposited into the Antitrust Enforcement Fund, a special fund 14created in the State treasury that is dedicated to enforcing 15this Act.16    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027.17(Source: P.A. 103-526, eff. 1-1-24.)